District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.32

License renewal.

The Board of Medicine shall renew the license of an anesthesiologist assistant who, in addition to meeting the requirements of § 3-1205.10, has submitted to the Board, along with the application for renewal, documentation of current certification as an Anesthesiologist Assistant — Certified (“AA-C”) by the Commission for the Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs, or its successor, including completion of the necessary continuing medical education credits required to maintain AA-C status.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 632
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-237, § 2(h), 51 DCR 10593